Maryland, session 2026, HB1054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–106.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1054*

HOUSE BILL 1054
(f) A prosecution for the commission of or the attempt to commit a misdemeanor
constituting[: (1)] a criminal offense under the Maryland Public Ethics Law[;] or [(2)]
CONSTITUTING criminal malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office committed by
an officer of the State, or of an agency of the State, or of a political subdivision of the State,
or of a bicounty or multicounty agency in the State shall be instituted within [2] 3 years
after the offense was committed.
(g) A prosecution for conspiracy to commit any of the offenses enumerated in
subsection (f) of this section shall be instituted within [2] 3 years after the offense was
committed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.